incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="kufi__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jsh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jtë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jtë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dogan/ë__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ën</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="muze__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="muze"><i>muze</i><par n="muze__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="doganë"><i>dogan</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kufi"><i>kufi</i><par n="kufi__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="analizë"><i>analiz</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="anketë"><i>anket</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aspiratë"><i>aspirat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="audiencë"><i>audienc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="direktivë"><i>direktiv</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="drogë"><i>drog</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="enklavë"><i>enklav</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="faturë"><i>fatur</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kornizë"><i>korniz</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kuotë"><i>kuot</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kuzhinë"><i>kuzhin</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ndalesë"><i>ndales</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="olimpiadë"><i>olimpiad</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="piramidë"><i>piramid</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pistë"><i>pist</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="preferencë"><i>preferenc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="presidencë"><i>presidenc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="referencë"><i>referenc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rezolutë"><i>rezolut</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkresë"><i>shkres</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="statujë"><i>statuj</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tarifë"><i>tarif</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="uzinë"><i>uzin</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zhurmë"><i>zhurm</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konsullatë"><i>konsullat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="licensë"><i>licens</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aleancë"><i>aleanc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ambasadë"><i>ambasad</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bazilikë"><i>bazilik</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bursë"><i>burs</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="demonstratë"><i>demonstrat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dilemë"><i>dilem</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmë"><i>dogm</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fshehtë"><i>fsheht</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gjykatë"><i>gjykat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gojëdhënë"><i>gojëdhën</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kaptinë"><i>kaptin</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kompetencë"><i>kompetenc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="korporatë"><i>korporat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kryqëzatë"><i>kryqëzat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="merimangë"><i>merimang</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ofensivë"><i>ofensiv</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="orbitë"><i>orbit</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="seancë"><i>seanc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkretëtirë"><i>shkretëtir</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkollë"><i>shkoll</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shoqatë"><i>shoqat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skemë"><i>skem</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tepricë"><i>tepric</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="unazë"><i>unaz</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="veturë"><i>vetur</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="yndyrë"><i>yndyr</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
